src/verb-udm-morph.txt
LEXICON MONO
+V+Ind+Prs:%> OPRS ;
+V+Ind+Fut:%>о FUTPAST ;
+V+Ind+PstI:%>и FUTPAST ;
+V+Ind+PstII:%>еме FUTPASTSG ;
+V+Ind+PstII:%>ем FUTPASTPL ;
+V+Cond:%>сал COND ;

LEXICON UZA
+V+Ind+Prs:%> APRS ;
+V+Ind+Fut:%>ло FUTPAST ;
+V+Ind+PstI:%> FUTPAST ;
+V+Ind+PstII:%>ме FUTPASTSG ;
+V+Ind+PstII:%>м FUTPASTPL ;
+V+Cond:%>сал COND ;


LEXICON OPRS
+Sg1:сько K ;
+Sg2:ськод K ;
+Sg3:е K ;
+Pl1:ськом K ;
+Pl1:ськомы K ;
+Pl2:ськоды K ;
+Pl3:о K ;

LEXICON APRS
+Sg1:сько K ;
+Sg2:ськод K ;
+Sg3: K ;
+Pl1:ськом K ;
+Pl1:ськомы K ;
+Pl2:ськоды K ;
+Pl3:ло K ;

LEXICON FUTPAST
FUTPASTSG ;
FUTPASTPL ;
FUTPASTPLSHORT ;

LEXICON FUTPASTSG 
+Sg1:%>^@ K ;
+Sg2:%>д K ;
+Sg3:%>з K ;

LEXICON FUTPASTPL 
+Pl1:%>мы K ;
+Pl2:%>ды K ;
+Pl3:%>зы K ;

LEXICON FUTPASTPLSHORT 
+Pl1:%>м K ;

LEXICON COND
K ;
